Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5582.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 205b. A zoning ordinance must not do either of the following: (a) Subject to requirements of and the regulations promulgated under the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, Public Law 101-336, require the provision of more than 1 parking space, including guest parking, per dwelling unit for a multifamily residential use of property. (b) Exclude from any residential zone a mobile home as defined in section 2 of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2302, including, but not limited to, implicit exclusion based on restrictions regarding aesthetics or construction material that are not necessary for public safety or are primarily intended to exclude mobile homes from a residential zone.